California, session 20252026, AB2768.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 69509.7 is added to the Education Code, immediately following Section 69509.6, to read:69509.7. (a) Commencing with the 2027–28 academic year, the California State University, each community college district, and private postsecondary educational institutions and independent institutions of higher education that receive state financial assistance shall, and the University of California is requested to, waive or defer the unpaid portion of enrollment fees and costs for a student that who has submitted a Free Application for Federal Student Aid or California Dream Act Application, if applicable, and is a foster youth or former foster youth, as defined pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 66025.9, and as verified by a financial aid administrator for the postsecondary educational institution, upon the student’s initial enrollment at the postsecondary educational institution until the student has received an initial disbursement of the student’s financial aid award. Enrollment fees and costs include, but shall not be limited to, all of the following:(a)(1) Registration fees, including a statement of intent to register.(b)(2) Mandatory campus fees.(c)(3) Campus housing and meals, including any required deposits.(d)(4) Health insurance.(e)(5) Books, supplies, materials, and equipment that may be required for enrolled courses. courses, except as provided in subdivision (b).(f)(6) Any associated costs of a summer course or program required to be taken for the student’s chosen major.(b) If a postsecondary educational institution is unable to waive or defer the costs described in paragraph (5) of subdivision (a), the institution shall provide the student with clear information regarding available campus resources, institutional programs, or community-based assistance to help the student cover those costs.(c) Community college districts are encouraged to use existing funding sources to implement this section, including, but not limited to, funding received pursuant to the NextUp program established pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 79220) of Chapter 9 of Part 48 of Division 7 and funding received pursuant to the Student Equity and Achievement Program established pursuant to Section 78222.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.